District of Columbia statutes.
38-1904

Teaching vacancies.

Teaching vacancies which occur during any school year may be filled by the assignment of teachers of special subjects and teachers not now assigned to classroom instruction, and such teachers are hereby made eligible for such assignment without further examination.

July 1, 1943, 57 Stat. 322, ch. 184, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1019.
1973 Ed., § 31-682.